District of Columbia statutes.
5-204

Medical attendance.

The park watchmen on April 28, 1902, provided by law and those that may thereafter be provided for by law for service in any of the public squares and reservations in the District of Columbia, shall receive free medical attendance, the same as the Metropolitan Police of said District.

History

Apr. 28, 1902, 32 Stat. 152, ch. 594

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-204.
1973 Ed., § 4-206.